Louisiana, session 2026, HB256.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:421 and 3996(B)(24) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§421. School employees; mandatory reporting requirements
Each school employee who is a mandatory reporter as defined in Children's
Code Article 603 is subject to all provisions of state law relative to mandatory
reporters, including but not limited to the training and reporting requirements for
teaching or child care providers provided in Children's Code Article 603.1.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 256 ENROLLED
(24) Mandatory reporter requirements, R.S. 17:421.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.